vi: Mẫu sản phẩm hoá chất: Mảnh; Gel; Các hột nhỏ; Liquid; Cám; Bột; Nén; Viên nén; Khác
el: Μορφή χημικού προϊόντος: Νιφάδες; Τζελ; Κόκκοι; Υγρό; Σβόλοι; Σκόνη; Στικ; Ταμπλέτες; Άλλο
sv: Kemisk produktform: Flingor; Gel; Granulat; Vätska; Pellets; Pulver; Stift; Tabletter; Övrigt
pl: Forma produktu chemicznego: Płatki; Żel; Granulki; Płyn; Granulki; Proszek; Przypnij; Tabletki; Inne
nb: Kjemisk produktform: Flak; Gel; Granulat; Væske; Pellets; Pulver; Pinne; Tabletter; Annet
da: Kemisk produktform: Flager; Gel; Granulater; Væske; Piller; Pulver; Pind; Tabletter; Andet
zh-CN: 化学品形态: 薄片; 发胶; 颗粒; 液体; 颗粒; 粉末; 棒/棍/签; 片剂; 其他
ko: 화학 제품 형태: 플레이크; 젤; 과립; 액상; 펠릿; 가루; 막대; 정제; 기타
fi: Kemiallinen tuotemuoto: Hiutaleet; Geeli; Rakeet; Nestemäinen; Pelletit; Jauhe; Tikku; Tabletit; Muu
cs: Forma chemického produktu: Vločky; Gel; Granule; Kapalina; Pelety; Prášek; Tyčinka; Tablety; Jiné
ja: 化学製品の形態: 薄片; ゲル; 顆粒; リキッド; ペレット; パウダー; スティック; 錠剤; その他
sl-SI: Oblika kemijskega izdelka: Kosmiči; Gel; Granule; Tekočina; Peleti; Prašek; V stiku; Tablete; Drugo
de: Produktform der Chemikalie: Flocken; Gel; Granulat; Flüssig; Pellets; Puder; Stick; Tabletten; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Forma produsului chimic: Fulgi; Gel; Granule; Lichid; Pelete; Pudră; Baton; Tablete; Altele
tr: Kimyasal ürün formu: Pullar; Jel; Granüller; Sıvı; Peletler; Pudra; Sap; Tabletler; Diğer
bg-BG: Форма на химически продукти: Люспи; Гел; Гранули; Течност; Пелети; Прах; Стик; Таблетки; Други
zh-TW: 化學商品形式: 片狀; 凝膠; 顆粒; 液態; 顆粒; 粉末; 棒狀; 片劑; 其他
th: รูปแบบผลิตภัณฑ์สารเคมี: แบบแผ่น; เจล; เม็ดเล็ก; แบบเหลว; รูปแบบเม็ด; แบบผง; แท่ง; แท็บเล็ต; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Oblik kemijskog proizvoda: Pahuljice; Gel; Granule; Tekućina; Peleti; Prah; Stik; Tablete; Ostalo
pt-BR: Formulação do produto químico: Flocos; Gel; Grãos; Líquido; Pelotas; Pó; Vareta; Comprimidos; Outro
nl: Vorm chemisch product: Vlokken; Gel; Korrels; Vloeistof; Pellets; Poeder; Stick; Tabletten; Andere
hu: Vegyszer formája: Pehely; Gél; Granulátum; Folyékony; Pellet; Por; Rúd; Tabletta; Egyéb
es: Forma de producto químico: Copos; Gel; Gránulos; Líquido; Pellets; Polvo; Palillo; Tabletas; Otros
ru: Форма выпуска химического средства: Хлопья; Гель; Гранулы; Жидкость; Гранулы; Порошок; Стик; Таблетки; Другое
fr: Forme du produit chimique: Flocons; Gel; Granulés; Liquide; Granulés; Poudré; Bâton; Comprimés; Autre
lt-LT: Cheminės medžiagos pavidalas: Dribsniai; Gelis; Granulės; Skystis; Gumulėliai; Milteliai; Lazdelė; Tabletės; Kita
pt-PT: Forma de produto alimentar: Flocos; Gel; Granulados; Líquido; Granulado; Pó; Taco; Tablets; Outro
en: Chemical product form: Flakes; Gel; Granules; Liquid; Pellets; Powder; Stick; Tablets; Other
sk-SK: Forma chemického produktu: Vločky; Gél; Granule; Kvapalina; Pelety; Prášok; Tyčinka; Tablety; Iné
it: Formato del prodotto chimico: Fiocchi; Gel; Granuli; Liquido; Pellet; Polvere; Stick; Pastiglie; Altro